test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-vuvdd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - vuʹvdd â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     vuʹvdd+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: vuʹvdd
     vuʹvdd+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: vuuʹd
     vuʹvdd+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: vuuʹd
     vuʹvdd+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: voudda
     vuʹvdd+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: vuuʹdest
     vuʹvdd+N+Sg+Com+Indef: vuuʹdin
     vuʹvdd+N+Ess+Indef: vuʹvdden
     vuʹvdd+N+Par+Indef: vuʹvdded
     vuʹvdd+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [vuuʹdtaa, vuuʹdtää]
     vuʹvdd+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: vuuʹd
     vuʹvdd+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: vuuʹdi
     vuʹvdd+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: vuuʹdid
     vuʹvdd+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: vuuʹdid
     vuʹvdd+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: vuuʹdin
     vuʹvdd+N+Pl+Com+Indef: vuuʹdivuiʹm
     vuʹvdd+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [vuuʹditaa, vuuʹditää]
